Hawaii statutes.
§448-9.4 American Board of Dental Examiners
(ADEX) examination; regional examinations. An applicant shall take and
pass the ADEX examination, and neither the state examination nor any regional
examination shall be accepted. [L 2005, c 121, §3; am L 2007, c 72, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next